tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYćĆčČđĐžŽabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxy-'.ëü

KEY qwertzuiopšđ|asdfghjklčćž|yxcvbnm|žšđ|ćščđž|žćđ|đšćž|zy|qawsedrftgyhuj|jikolpč|aysxdcfvgbh|hnjmk

FLAG long

SFX AA Y 4
SFX AA 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AA 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AA 0 u .	+DVLjd 
SFX AA 0 em .	+Ijd 

SFX AB Y 9
SFX AB 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AB ac ca .	+GAjd 
SFX AB ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX AB ac če .	+Vjd 
SFX AB ac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX AB ac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX AB 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX AB ac cima .	+DLImn 
SFX AB ac ce .	+Amn 

SFX AC Y 8
SFX AC 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AC 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AC 0 u .	+DVLjd 
SFX AC 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AC 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX AC 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX AC 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX AC 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX AD Y 7
SFX AD 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AD 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX AD 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AD 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AD 0 i .	+NVjd 
SFX AD 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX AD 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX AE Y 5
SFX AE 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AE 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX AE 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AE 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX AE 0 om .	+Ijd 

SFX AF Y 8
SFX AF 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AF 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AF 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AF 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AF 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AF 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX AF 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AF 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX AG Y 7
SFX AG 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AG 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AG 0 u .	+DVLjd 
SFX AG anj njevi .	+NVmn 
SFX AG anj njeva .	+Gmn 
SFX AG anj njevima .	+DLImn 
SFX AG anj njeve .	+Amn 

SFX AH Y 9
SFX AH 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AH 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AH 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AH 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX AH 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX AH 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX AH 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX AH 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX AH 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX AI Y 9
SFX AI 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AI 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AI 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX AI h še .	+Vjd 
SFX AI 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AI 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AI 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX AI 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AI 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX AJ Y 7
SFX AJ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AJ 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX AJ 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AJ 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX AJ 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AJ 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX AJ 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX AK Y 8
SFX AK 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AK ac ca .	+Gjd 
SFX AK ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX AK ac če .	+Vjd 
SFX AK ac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX AK ac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX AK 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX AK ac cima .	+DLImn 

SFX AL Y 4
SFX AL 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AL 0 i .	+GDVLIjdNGAVmn 
SFX AL 0 ju .	+Ijd 
SFX AL 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX AM Y 8
SFX AM 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AM 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX AM 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX AM h še .	+Vjd 
SFX AM 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AM h si .	+NVjd 
SFX AM h sima .	+DLImn 
SFX AM 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX AN Y 8
SFX AN 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AN alj a .	+Gjd 
SFX AN alj lju .	+DLVjd 
SFX AN alj ljem .	+Ijd 
SFX AN alj ljevi .	+NVmn 
SFX AN alj ljeva .	+Gmn 
SFX AN alj ljevima .	+DLImn 
SFX AN alj ljeve .	+Amn 

SFX AO Y 9
SFX AO 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AO ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX AO ak ku .	+DLjd 
SFX AO ak če .	+Vjd 
SFX AO ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX AO ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX AO 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX AO ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX AO ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX AP Y 8
SFX AP 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AP 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX AP 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AP k če .	+Vjd 
SFX AP 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AP čovjek ljudi .	+NGVmn 
SFX AP čovjek ljudima .	+DLImn 
SFX AP čovjek ljude .	+Amn 

SFX AQ Y 7
SFX AQ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AQ 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX AQ 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX AQ 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX AQ 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX AQ 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX AQ 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX AR Y 9
SFX AR 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AR ar ra .	+GAjd 
SFX AR ar ru .	+DLVjd 
SFX AR ar rom .	+Ijd 
SFX AR ar rovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AR ar ri .	+Nmn 
SFX AR 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX AR ar rovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AR ar rove .	+Amn 

SFX AS Y 7
SFX AS 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AS 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX AS 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AS 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX AS 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AS 0 i .	+Nmn 
SFX AS 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX AT Y 7
SFX AT 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AT 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX AT 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX AT 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AT 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX AT 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX AT 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX AU Y 7
SFX AU 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AU o jelova .	+Gmn 
SFX AU o jelu .	+DLjd 
SFX AU o jelom .	+Ijd 
SFX AU o jelovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AU o jelovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AU o jelove .	+Amn 

SFX AV Y 9
SFX AV 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AV 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX AV 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AV h še .	+Vjd 
SFX AV 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AV 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AV 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX AV 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AV 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX AW Y 8
SFX AW 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX AW 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX AW 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AW 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX AW 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AW 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AW 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AW 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX AX Y 10
SFX AX 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AX 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX AX 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX AX 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AX 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX AX k cima .	+DLImn 
SFX AX 0 e .	+Amn 
SFX AX 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AX k če .	+Vjd 
SFX AX k ci .	+NVjd 

SFX AY Y 9
SFX AY 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AY 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX AY 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AY 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX AY 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AY 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX AY 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX AY 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX AY 0 ove .	+Imn 

SFX AZ Y 7
SFX AZ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX AZ 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX AZ 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX AZ 0 e .	+AjdAmn 
SFX AZ 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX AZ 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX AZ 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX BA Y 10
SFX BA 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BA ac ca .	+GAjd 
SFX BA ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX BA ac če .	+Vjd 
SFX BA ac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX BA ac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX BA 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX BA ac cima .	+DLImn 
SFX BA ac ci .	+Vmn 
SFX BA ac ce .	+Amn 

SFX BB Y 9
SFX BB 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BB 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BB 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BB 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BB 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BB 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX BB 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX BB 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX BB 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX BC Y 10
SFX BC 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BC 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BC 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BC 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BC 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BC in a .	+Nmn 
SFX BC in e .	+Gmn 
SFX BC in i .	+DLmn 
SFX BC in u .	+Amn 
SFX BC in om .	+Imn 

SFX BD Y 8
SFX BD 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BD 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BD 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BD 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX BD 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BD 0 i .	+NGVmn 
SFX BD 0 iju .	+Gmn 
SFX BD 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX BE Y 7
SFX BE 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BE 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX BE 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BE 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BE 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX BE 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BE 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX BF Y 8
SFX BF 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BF 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX BF 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BF 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BF 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BF 0 i .	+NGVmn 
SFX BF 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BF 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX BG Y 9
SFX BG 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BG 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX BG 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BG 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BG 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BG 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX BG 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX BG 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX BG 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX BH Y 7
SFX BH 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BH 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX BH 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BH 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX BH 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX BH 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BH 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX BI Y 9
SFX BI 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BI 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BI 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BI 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BI 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BI in i .	+NVmn 
SFX BI in a .	+Gmn 
SFX BI in ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BI in e .	+Amn 

SFX BJ Y 9
SFX BJ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BJ ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX BJ ak ku .	+DLVjd 
SFX BJ ak če .	+Vjd 
SFX BJ ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX BJ ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX BJ 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX BJ ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX BJ ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX BK Y 9
SFX BK 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BK 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX BK 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BK 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BK 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BK 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX BK 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX BK 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX BK 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX BL Y 8
SFX BL 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BL 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BL 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BL 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BL 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX BL 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX BL 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX BL 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX BM Y 7
SFX BM 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BM 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX BM 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX BM 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX BM 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BM 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BM 0 u .	+DLjd 

SFX BN Y 8
SFX BN 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BN 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX BN 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BN k če .	+Vjd 
SFX BN 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BN k ci .	+NVmn 
SFX BN k cima .	+DLImn 
SFX BN 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX BO Y 8
SFX BO 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BO 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BO 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BO 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BO 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX BO 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX BO 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX BO 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX BP Y 8
SFX BP 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BP 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX BP 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BP 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX BP 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX BP 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX BP 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX BP 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX BQ Y 8
SFX BQ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BQ 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BQ 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BQ 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX BQ 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX BQ 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX BQ 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX BQ 0 eve .	+Amn 
