tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.dic
adresat/AJ
alkar/AT
alkoholičar/AT
alpinist/AJ
analist/AJ
anestetičar/AT
antikvar/AT
arbun/AJ
Beč/AA
bijelac/AB
blic/AC
bodež/AD
bohemist/AJ
brat/AE
brod/AF
brojčanik/BN
bubanj/AG
car/AH
ceh/AI
crv/AJ
čamac/AK
čar/AL
Čeh/AM
češalj/AN
čovječuljak/AO
čovjek/AP
čuvar/AQ
čvarak/AO
dabar/AR
dan/AS
dar/BG
dio/AU
djever/AT
dom/BG
duh/AV
dvor/AW
đak/AX
ekonomist/AJ
Englez/AT
esejist/AJ
Francuz/AT
galeb/AY
gavran/AZ
glumac/BA
golub/BB
gospodar/AT
gospodin/BC
gost/BD
grabež/BE
grad/BF
grad/BG
gradić/BH
građanin/BI
graničnik/BN
grašak/BJ
grom/BK
hrast/BG
jaram/BB
jaram/BG
jastreb/BL
jelen/BM
jezik/BN
jež/BO
kokot/AJ
kraj/BP
kralj/BQ
kroatist/AJ
labud/BB
leptir/AT
mornar/AT
novinar/AT
nožić/BH
padež/BE
palež/BE
pas/BG
ribar/AT
rudar/AT
sat/BF
slučaj/BP
smuđ/BQ
stočar/AT
tenk/BG
udjel/BG
zbor/BG
žar/BG
